apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="síl__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eamar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>feá</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>feadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>feadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fear</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fidís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fimid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fimis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>finn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teá</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tear</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ios__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>easa</l>
          <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ios</l>
          <r>ios<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bua/ladh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>ladh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ladh</l>
          <r>ladh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="té/ac__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ac</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ac<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="athscinn"><i>athscinn</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eisil"><i>eisil</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adhmhill"><i>adhmhill</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="athfhill"><i>athfhill</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="idirbhris"><i>idirbhris</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scaoil"><i>scaoil</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mill"><i>mill</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scinn"><i>scinn</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="múin"><i>múin</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="síl"><i>síl</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urscaoil"><i>urscaoil</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urchoill"><i>urchoill</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="séid"><i>séid</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sroich"><i>sroich</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sméid"><i>sméid</i><par n="síl__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bonnbhualadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>onnbhua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fios"><par n="initial-f"/><i></i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fo-chomhfhios"><par n="initial-f"/><i>o-chomhfh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhfhios"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omhfh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bualadh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crosbhualadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rosbhua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frithbhualadh"><par n="initial-f"/><i>rithbhua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clóbhualadh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lóbhua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neamh-chomhfhios"><i>neamh-chomhfh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="réamhfhios"><i>réamhfh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sárfhios"><par n="initial-s"/><i>árfh</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imbhualadh"><par n="initial-i"/><i>mbhua</i><par n="bua/ladh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="téac"><par n="initial-t"/><i>é</i><par n="té/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Crios"><i>Cr</i><par n="f/ios__n"/></e>
